apertium-niv.niv.lexd
LEXICON IVerbRoot
пʼры:п{ʼ}ры       # to come
му:му             # to die
чека:чека         # to be strong
ӿарӻо:ӿарӻо        # to be strong
чез:чез           # to be weak
чола:чола         # to be poor
ӈалы:ӈалы         # to be delirious, to talk nonsense
ӄʼо:ӄ{ʼ}о         # to sleep
ви:ви             # to go
пʼу:п{ʼ}у         # to go out, exit
тывғ:тывғ         # to enter a house
тʼаӽта:т{ʼ}аӽта   # to be angry
ӿеӻа:ӿеӻа          # to be afraid
пʼолағ:п{ʼ}олағ   # to shout
пʼим:п{ʼ}им       # to run away
ӄотю:ӄотю         # to fall silent
оз:оз             # to stand up
кут:кут           # to fall
лук:лук           # to be fluffy
там:там           # to be numerous
маӈӻ:маӈӻ         # to be powerful, to be rich
эзму:эзму         # to rejoice
ӄʼав:ӄ{ʼ}ав       # to be warm
ӈар:ӈар           # to be fat
паӻ:паӻ           # to be red
эна:эна           # to be another
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
        #!!! New words !!!
        #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
нить:нить       # to aim
энӈаӻз:энӈаӻз   # to be impudent, insolent
иньғ:иньғ       # to be impudent, insolent
кулу:кулу       # to open one's eyes
кʼрыу:к{ʼ}рыу   # to rest
ӄʼотихоти:ӄ{ʼ}отихоти # to engage in hooliganism; to fool around, mess around
лаулау:лаулау   # to argue
лвы:лвы         # to be fastidious, squeamish
невур:невур     # to be affable, communicable, forthcoming, charming
ньма:ньма       # to be timid, fearful
ур:ур           # to be good
к’лу:к{’}лу     # to be afraid
вуквук:вуквук   # to be dark
малғо:малғо     # to be much; a lot

LEXICON IrregBoundVerbRoot
ни:ни           # to eat

LEXICON IrregFreeVerbRoot
инь:инь         # to eat

LEXICON TENSE
<fut>:>ны
<nonfut>:>

LEXICON MOOD
<itg>:>л
<ind>:>{д}ь
<pot>:>{Q}ана
# %<imp%>:%>idk

PATTERNS
TVerbRoot TENSE MOOD

# LEXICON IVerb-AdvRoot
# ур:ур        # well
# эӻ:эӻ         # quickly
# малғо:малғо  # much; a lot

LEXICON AdverbRoot
CnjAdvRoot
ItgAdvRoot
AdvRoot

LEXICON CnjAdvRoot
ӿоӻор:ӿоӻор         # then, thereupon
ӿоӻорӈан:ӿоӻорӈан   # then, at that time
ӿаӈан:ӿаӈан        # then, in that case

LEXICON ItgAdvRoot
ыыр:ыыр            # when

LEXICON AdvRoot
напа:напа        # still
нав:нав          # now
лили:лили        # very
тʼыфк:тʼыфк      # long ago, a long time ago
нымр:нымр        # yesterday
ник:ник          # recently
аньтьый:аньтьый  # again
эрғали:эрғали    # much, many
эрғале:эрғале    # much, many

LEXICON ParticleRoot
варк<part>:>{B}арк  # only

LEXICON InterjRoot
ӿы:ӿы    # yes

LEXICON Punctuation
.<sent>:. #
..<sent>:.. #
...<sent>:... #
#%;<sent>:%; #
#%:<sent>:%: #
!<sent>:! #
#%-<guio>:%- #
#%—<guio>:%— #
,<cm>:, #
?<sent>:? #
'<apos>:' #
"<sent>:" #
«<lquot>:« #
»<rquot>:» #
”<rquot>:” #
“<lquot>:“ #
(<lpar>:( #
#]<rpar>:] #
#[<lpar>:[ #
)<rpar>:) #
\<sent>:\ #
/<sent>:/ #

# Resources:
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
